Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1925
Licenses; revenue placed in General Fund.

The revenue derived from all licenses issued pursuant to sections 81-1901 to 81-1936 shall be placed in the General Fund.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 25.